Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-714
Construction near airports; application; notice; hearing; waiver; rules and regulations by Director of Aeronautics.

Upon the filing of an application by any applicant for permission to construct or alter any overhead wire, cable, or pipeline as provided in section 75-713, the commission shall notify the Director of Aeronautics of the filing of the application and the date that it will be heard before the commission, except that if the application is accompanied by approval in writing of the Director of Aeronautics, the hearing may be waived and the permission granted without such hearing unless otherwise required by law. The Director of Aeronautics shall establish and publish rules and regulations consistent with the rules of the United States Department of Commerce, Division of Aeronautics, and the National Electrical Safety Code covering the requirements that the applicant is required to meet in order to obtain approval for the construction or alteration of any overhead wire, cable, or pipeline which is not exempt from the requirements of section 75-713.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 14, p. 1425;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 125.